California statutes. Elections Code
 Top of group1.1.1.2.2.2.3.3.3.etc.etc.etc.Dated at Sacramento, California, this ______ day of ______, 20___.(SEAL)(Secretary of State)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6954.

At least 68 days before a presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each county elections official a certified list containing the names and addresses of the candidates for whom nomination papers have been filed and who are entitled to be voted for at the presidential primary.

The certified list shall be in substantially the following form:

CERTIFIED LIST OF CANDIDATES
secretary of state

To the County Elections Official of ____ County: 

I, ____, Secretary of State, do hereby certify that the following list contains the name and post office address of each person for whom nomination papers have been filed in my office and who is entitled to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, as nominee of the Republican Party.List of Candidates
 Republican PartyNameAddress1 2 3 etc.etc.Dated at Sacramento, California, this ______ day of ______, 
20___.(SEAL)Secretary of State

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. POLITICAL PARTY ORGANIZATION AND CENTRAL COMMITTEE ELECTIONS [7000. - 7928.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [7000. - 7000.]

7000.

All references to a voter’s or candidate’s party “registration” or “affiliation” in this division shall refer to the party preference or lack of party preference disclosed by the voter or candidate in accordance with Sections 2151 and 2152 and subdivision (b) of Section 2154.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 16.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. DEMOCRATIC PARTY [7050. - 7244.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7050. - 7050.]

7050.

This part shall apply to the organization, operation, and functions of that political party known as the Democratic Party of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Presidential Electors [7100. - 7100.]

7100.

In each year of the general election at which electors of President and Vice President of the United States are to be chosen, the candidate in each congressional district who received the largest number of votes in the primary election among the candidates who disclosed a preference for the Democratic Party shall designate one presidential elector and one alternate presidential elector for the purposes of Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of Division 6 and shall file each elector’s name and residence and business address with the state chairperson by a date specified by the state chairperson. The candidate for United States Senate who received the largest number of votes in the primary election among the candidates who disclosed a preference
 for the Democratic Party in each of the last two United States senatorial elections shall designate one presidential elector and one alternate presidential elector and shall file each elector’s name and residence and business address with the state chairperson by a date specified by the state chairperson. In the event there is no candidate for United States Senate or for any particular congressional district who disclosed a preference for the Democratic Party, or if any candidate fails to designate a presidential elector and alternate presidential elector by the date specified by the state chairperson, the state chairperson shall designate one presidential elector and one alternate presidential elector for each vacancy. The state chairperson shall file the names and residence and business addresses of all the electors designated pursuant to this section with the Secretary of State by October 1 of the
 presidential election year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 9.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Central Committee [7150. - 7152.]

7150.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the elements and practices of the state central committee shall be the same as set forth in the standing rules and bylaws of the Democratic Party of California, including the following:

(a) The membership of the state central committee.

(b) The procedures for notifying members of appointments.

(c) Proxy provisions.

(d) The form of appointment of members to the state central committee.

(e) The officers, methods of electing officers, and their terms.

(f) Quorum requirements for meetings of the state central committee.

(g) The procedures for the conduct of committee proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 1396)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

The state central committee shall conduct party campaigns for the party and on behalf of the candidates of the party. It shall appoint committees and appoint and employ campaign directors and perform all other activities relating to campaign organizations it deems suitable or desirable and in the best interest of the party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 1396)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

The Democratic Party of California shall post a current copy of its standing rules and bylaws for public inspection on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 1396)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Central Committee [7200. - 7244.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7200. - 7216.]

7200.

(a) In each county containing less than five Assembly districts, a county committee shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number to be elected from any supervisor district shall be determined as follows: There shall be taken the number of votes cast in the supervisor district at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes and who was the candidate of that party alone. This number shall be divided by one-twentieth of the number of votes cast in that county for Governor or, where the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained
 by that division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that supervisor district.

(b) The committees in counties containing less than five Assembly districts shall be composed of not less than 21 members. If the procedure outlined above would result in less than 21 members being elected for any committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in each supervisor district shall be divided by an amount sufficiently smaller than one-twentieth of the votes cast for Governor in that county as to give a membership in the committee equal to or the nearest amount that is greater than 21 members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a county of the fifth class as defined in Section 28026 of the Government Code, the elected members of the county central committee shall be elected by Assembly districts and shall consist of six members elected from each Assembly district, whether wholly or partly within the county, provided each such member is a resident of the county and of the Assembly district which the member represents. Only a person who is a resident of the county may vote for a candidate for membership to the county central committee and
 may vote only for candidates seeking to represent the Assembly district in which the voter resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the County of Sacramento, the elected members of the county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts with six members elected from each supervisor district. Each member shall be a resident of the county and of the supervisor district that the member represents. Only a person who is a resident of the county may vote for a candidate for membership to the county central committee and may vote only for candidates seeking to represent the supervisor district in which the voter resides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   (AB 3370)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the County of Alameda, the elected members of the county central committee shall be elected by Assembly districts and the number to be elected from any Assembly district shall be determined as follows: There shall be taken the number of votes cast in that portion of the Assembly district lying within the County of Alameda at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes and who was the candidate of that party alone. This number shall be divided by one-thirtieth of the number of votes cast in the county for Governor or, where the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate
 mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained by that division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that Assembly district.

(b) If the procedure described above would result in less than 30 members being elected for any committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in that portion of each Assembly district lying within the County of Alameda shall be divided by an amount sufficiently smaller than one-thirtieth of the votes cast for Governor in the county as to give a membership in the committee equal to or the nearest amount that is greater than 30 members.

Only a person who is a resident of the county may vote for a candidate for membership to the county central committee and may vote only for candidates seeking to represent the Assembly district in which the voter
 resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

In each county containing more than four and less than 20 Assembly districts, a county central committee shall be elected from Assembly districts and shall consist of six members elected from each Assembly district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

In each county containing 20 or more Assembly districts a county central committee shall consist of seven members elected from each Assembly district contained either wholly or partially within the county. In an Assembly district that lies only partially within a county containing 20 or more Assembly districts, the seven members shall be elected from that portion of the Assembly district contained within the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7204.

(a) In the City and County of San Francisco, the county central committee shall be elected from the two Assembly districts located in the city and county and shall consist of 24 members. Whichever of the two Assembly districts consists of the majority of the registered Democrats in the city and county shall elect 14 members and the Assembly district that consists of the minority of the registered Democrats in the city and county shall elect 10 members.

(b) Both of the following shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Registered Democrat” means any voter in the city and county who has expressed a preference for the
 Democratic Party on their affidavit of registration pursuant to Sections 2150, 2151, and 2152 as of the 154th day prior to the first direct primary election after any redistricting of Assembly district boundaries.

(2) The City and County of San Francisco Department of Elections, or any comparable successor agency, shall calculate the percentage of the total registered Democrats in each Assembly district in the city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 854, Sec. 4.   (AB 3284)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7205.

Notwithstanding this article, each county central committee by resolution may provide for the election of all or a portion of central committee members to represent individual central committee districts. The member shall reside in the district he or she represents but shall be elected at large within the Assembly district in which the county central committee district he or she represents is located.

The county central committee shall reapportion itself at least every 10 years, prior to the June primary election of
 that year. Each district shall be apportioned on the basis of the number of registered Democrats for the June primary in each even-numbered year, with no more than a 10-percent deviation from the average. Each district shall be compact, contiguous, and utilize any natural and neighborhood boundaries. The district boundaries shall not cut across any district lines of a precinct as drawn by the elections official for the last general or consolidated election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7206.

In each county the nominee of this party for Senator or the incumbent Senator, the nominees of this party for the Assembly, and any person elected to either the Senate or Assembly at a special election to fill a vacancy in that house, and the nominee of this party for Representative in Congress, and any person elected at a special election to fill a vacancy in the House of Representatives, shall be ex officio members of this committee. If the person elected from one party at the special election for an Assembly or Senate seat, or for the House of Representatives, shall be other than the nominee of that party for the same office at the prior election, the ex officio membership of the nominee shall expire immediately upon
 certification by the Secretary of State of the election. Ex officio members shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges, including the right to vote, and shall have the same standing in every way as other members of this committee, except they shall not be entitled to a ballot designation of incumbent upon seeking election to this committee in the next presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7207.

The incumbent or nominee of each of the following offices shall be an ex officio member of the committee in the county in which he or she resides:

(a) Governor.

(b) Lieutenant Governor.

(c) Secretary of State.

(d) Controller.

(e) Treasurer.

(f) Attorney General.

(g) Member of the State Board of Equalization.

(h) United States Senator from California.

His or her rights and privileges shall be the same as those prescribed for other ex officio members in Section 7206.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7208.

A committee may authorize any member of that committee, whether elected or ex officio, to appoint an alternate if a member desires to appoint an alternate. An incumbent Member of the Senate or Assembly at the time of the meeting of the committee may appoint an alternate member without authorization from that committee, if the member desires to appoint an alternate.

That alternate member shall have the right to vote only with the written authorization of the member who appointed him or her. An alternate member of a
 county central committee shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the committee.

An alternate member must meet the same qualifications as the regular member and may vote only in the absence of the member who appointed him or her.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7209.

(a) A person is not eligible for election to a committee if the person’s affidavit of registration does not state a political party preference for this party at the time of the person’s election.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or Section 8001, a person who is not a United States citizen, but who would be eligible to register to vote if the person were a United States citizen, is eligible for election to a committee if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The bylaws of the committee permit a person who is not a United States citizen, but who would be eligible to register to vote if the person were a United States citizen, to serve as a member of the committee.

(2) The person meets all other eligibility requirements for election to the committee that are imposed by the bylaws of the
 committee or this code.

(3) The committee, not later than the 172nd day preceding the presidential primary election, does both of the following:

(A) Notifies the county elections official that its bylaws permit a person who is not a United States citizen, but who would be eligible to register to vote if the person were a United States citizen, to be elected to, and to serve as a member of, the committee.

(B) Provides the county elections official with a list of the eligibility requirements in its
 bylaws for a person to be elected to, and to serve on, the committee.

(4) At the time the person files a declaration of candidacy, the person also files a declaration of eligibility with the county elections official. The county elections official shall attach the list of eligibility requirements provided by the committee in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) to the blank declaration of eligibility. The declaration of eligibility shall be substantially as follows:DECLARATION OF ELIGIBILITYI hereby
 declare that I have filed a declaration of candidacy for nomination to the office of _____ to be voted for at the primary election to be held ______, 20__, and declare the following to be true:My name is .I have reviewed the attached list of eligibility requirements to be elected to, and to serve on, the county central committee, and I meet those requirements.Dated this ____ day of _____, 20__Signature of candidateState of California )County of ) ss. )Subscribed and sworn to before me this ________ day of ________, 20____.Notary Public (or other official)Examined and certified by me this ________ day of ________, 20____. County Elections Official(c) (1) The county elections official shall accept a completed declaration of eligibility filed by a candidate pursuant to subdivision (b) as a certification that the person is eligible for election to the committee. This section shall not be construed to permit or require the elections official to verify independently whether a candidate who has filed a declaration of eligibility satisfies the eligibility requirements provided by the committee in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(2) In lieu of attaching a certificate to a candidate’s declaration of candidacy in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8001, the elections official shall attach a candidate’s completed declaration of eligibility to the candidate’s completed declaration of candidacy, and shall preserve both documents in accordance with Section 17100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.   (SB 714)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7211.

In the event that the candidates elected to a committee from a district do not equal the number of party committeepersons to which the district is entitled to be represented, a vacancy or vacancies exist to the extent of the difference between the number of elected committeepersons and the number of committeepersons by which the district is entitled to be represented. When the vacancy or vacancies exist they shall be filled by the committee to which insufficient members were elected, in the manner provided for in Section 7212.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7212.

In the event of the appointment or election to a committee of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of the committee dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated to act, or removes from the jurisdiction of the committee, or ceases to be a member of this party, a vacancy exists which shall be filled by appointment by the committee in which the ineligibility or vacancy occurs. A vacancy shall also exist on a committee when a member is removed from the committee pursuant to Section 7213 or 7215.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7213.

Any member of a committee, other than an ex officio member, who misses more than three consecutive regularly called meetings may be removed by a vote of the committee concerned, unless his or her absence is caused by illness or temporary absence from the county on the date of the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7214.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a committee from the Assembly district or supervisor district from which he or she has been elected or appointed a member of that committee shall constitute his or her automatic resignation from the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7215.

A committee may remove any member, other than an ex officio member, who during his or her term of membership affiliates with, or registers as a member of another party, who publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of this party for any office, or who gives support or avows a preference for a candidate of another party or candidate who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7216.

Whenever any person is appointed to fill a vacancy on a committee, the chairperson of the committee shall file notices of the appointment with the elections official and the chairperson of the state central committee within 30 days after it is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and the name of the person replaced, and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Elections [7225. - 7230.]

7225.

At every presidential primary election, a county central committee may be elected in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 2.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7226.

The elections official, no later than January 31 preceding the presidential primary, shall compute the number of members of the committee allotted to each Assembly district or supervisor district, as the case may be, pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 3.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7227.

In each county the name of each candidate for member of a committee shall appear upon the ballot only upon the filing of a nomination paper pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8020) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8100), inclusive, of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 8, signed in his or her behalf by the voters of the Assembly or supervisorial district in which he or she is a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7228.

If the elections official, on the 73rd day prior to the presidential primary election, finds that the number of candidates nominated for election to a committee from an Assembly or supervisorial district does not exceed the number of candidates to be elected from that Assembly or supervisorial district, the designation of the office and the names of the candidates shall not be printed on this party’s ballot in the Assembly or supervisorial district. In lieu thereof, the board of supervisors shall declare elected the candidates who have been nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 4.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7229.

Whenever a candidate for election to a committee dies on or before the day of election, and a sufficient number of ballots are marked as being voted for him or her to entitle him or her to election if he or she had lived until after the election, a vacancy exists on the county central committee, which shall be filled by the committee in the same manner as other vacancies are filled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7230.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county central committee, in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the committee, may select its members at any time by holding a caucus or convention, or by using any other method of selection approved by the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 5.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings [7235. - 7236.]

7235.

All meetings of the committee shall be held in quarters that shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7236.

The Department of General Services shall permit any committee to hold meetings in a state building within the county. At least one committee meeting each month shall be free of charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Business [7240. - 7244.]

7240.

A committee shall have charge of the party campaign under general direction of the state central committee or of the executive committee selected by the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7241.

A committee may make rules and regulations providing:

(a) How officers of the committee may be removed.

(b) How meetings may be called, and any provisions so made shall supersede anything in this chapter to the contrary.

(c) Whether or not proxies may be used and the conditions under which they may be used.

Any rule adopted
 prior to statutory authorization by any committee by majority vote of the members elected to the committee is hereby validated and made of the same effect as if subsequently adopted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7242.

The committees shall perform any other duties and services for this political party as seem to be for the benefit of the party. They shall continue to function and exist until the election at the succeeding presidential primary, or the selection pursuant to Section 7230, and qualification of the members of the new committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 6.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7243.

If the chairperson of a committee refuses to call a meeting, a meeting may be called upon five days’ notice by a majority of the members of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7244.

Within five days after a committee meets for its organizational meeting, the newly elected chairperson of the committee shall notify the county elections official of his or her name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. REPUBLICAN PARTY [7250. - 7470.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7250. - 7250.]

7250.

This part shall apply to the organization, operation, and function of that political party known as the California Republican Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 60, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Presidential Electors [7300. - 7300.]

7300.

(a) In each year of the general election at which electors of President and Vice President of the United States are to be chosen, the Republican nominees for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Treasurer, Controller, Attorney General, and Secretary of State, the Republican nominees for United States Senator at the last two United States senatorial elections, the Assembly Republican leader, the Senate Republican leader, all elected officers of the Republican State Central Committee, the National Committeeman and National Committeewoman, the President of the Republican County Central Committee Chairmen’s Association, and the chairperson or president of each Republican volunteer organization officially recognized by the Republican State Central Committee shall act as presidential electors, except that Senators, Representatives, and
 persons holding an office of trust or profit of the United States shall not act as electors. Each of those persons acting as electors pursuant to this subdivision shall also designate an alternate elector for the purposes of Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of Division 6 and notify the chairperson of the Republican State Central Committee of the name, residence address, and business address of the alternate elector.

(b) The remaining presidential elector positions, and any vacant positions, shall be filled by appointment of the chairperson of the Republican State Central Committee in accordance with the bylaws of the committee. The chairperson shall also appoint an alternate elector for each elector appointed by the chairperson. The name, residence address, and business address of each appointee and each alternate elector described in this subdivision and subdivision (a) shall be filed with the Secretary of State by October
 1 of the presidential election year. The Republican State Central Committee shall adopt bylaws implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 54.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Central Committee [7350. - 7354.]

7350.

The membership of delegates to the state central committee, procedures for notification of members of appointments, proxy provisions, and form of appointment of delegate members shall be as set forth in the standing rules and bylaws of the California Republican Party. The California Republican Party shall maintain a current copy of its standing rules and bylaws for public inspection on the Internet.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7352.

The officers, methods of electing officers, terms of officers, quorum requirements for meetings of the state central committee and procedures for the conduct of committee proceedings and adoption of a state party platform shall be as set forth in the standing rules and bylaws of the California Republican Party.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7353.

The state central committee shall conduct party campaigns for the party and on behalf of the candidates of the party. It shall appoint committees and appoint and employ campaign directors and perfect whatever campaign organizations it deems suitable or desirable and for the best interest of the party.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7354.

(a) The state central committee may prohibit or limit the power of county central committees established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7400) to endorse, support, or oppose any candidate for nomination by the California Republican Party for partisan office in the direct primary election.

(b) The superior court, in any case brought before it by the state central committee or by any registered voter, may issue a temporary or permanent restraining order or
 injunction to prohibit the endorsement, support, or opposition by a county central committee of any candidate for nomination by the California Republican Party for partisan office in the direct primary election, if the endorsement, support, or opposition is in violation of the bylaws or rules of the state central committee. All cases of this nature shall be in a preferred position for purposes of trial and appeal, so as to ensure the speedy disposition thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Central Committee [7400. - 7470.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7400. - 7414.]

7400.

In each county containing less than five Assembly districts, a county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number to be elected from any supervisor district shall be determined as follows: There shall be taken the number of votes cast in the supervisor district at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes and who was the candidate of that party alone.
 This number shall be divided by one-twentieth of the number of votes cast in that county for Governor or, where the party had no candidate for Governor, for the candidate mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained by such division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that supervisor district.

The committees in counties containing less than five Assembly districts shall be composed of not less than 21 members. If the procedure outlined above would result in less than 21 members being elected for any committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in each supervisor district shall be divided by an amount sufficiently smaller than one-twentieth of the votes cast for Governor in that county as to give a membership in the committee equal to or the nearest amount which is greater than 21 members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7400.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 7400 and 7401, in the County of Sacramento, the county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number to be elected from any supervisor district shall be determined as follows: There shall be taken the number of votes cast in the supervisor district at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party did not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes
 and who was the candidate of that party alone. This number shall be divided by one-thirtieth of the number of votes cast in Sacramento County for Governor or, where the party did not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained by that division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that supervisor district.

(b) The Sacramento County Central Committee shall be composed of not less than 31 members. If the procedure outlined above would result in less than 31 members being elected for any committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in each supervisor district shall be divided by an amount sufficiently smaller than one-thirtieth of the votes cast for Governor in Sacramento County as to give a membership on the committee equal to or the nearest amount that is greater than 31 members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7400.2.

Notwithstanding Sections 7400 and 7401, in the County of Placer, the county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts and shall be composed of seven members elected from each of the supervisor districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (AB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7400.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 7400 and 7401, in the County of Santa Clara, the county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number to be elected from any supervisor district shall be determined as follows:

(1) There shall be taken the number of votes cast in the supervisor district at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party did not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party
 voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes and who was the candidate of that party alone.

(2) This number shall be divided by one-twenty-second of the number of votes cast in Santa Clara County for Governor or, where the party did not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate mentioned above. The integer next larger than the quotient obtained by that division shall constitute the number of members of the committee to be elected by that party in that supervisor district.

(b) The Santa Clara County Central Committee shall be composed of not less than 23 members. If the procedure outlined above would result in less than 23 members being elected to the committee, the number of votes cast for this party’s candidate in each supervisor district shall be divided by an amount sufficiently smaller than one-twenty-second of the votes cast for Governor in
 Santa Clara County as to give a membership on the committee equal to or the nearest amount that is greater than 23 members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7400.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 7400 and 7401, in the County of San Bernardino, the county central committee shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number to be elected from any supervisor district shall be determined as follows:

(1) There shall be taken the number of votes cast in the supervisor district at the last gubernatorial election for that party’s candidate for Governor, or, if the party did
 not have a candidate for Governor, for the candidate of the party voted on throughout the state who received the greatest number of votes and who was the candidate of that party alone.
